Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
326

HANSEN'S
DISEASE

Section

326-1 Establishment of facilities for the
treatment and care

of persons with Hansen's disease

326-1.3 Liberty, autonomy, and dignity of patient
residents

326-1.5 Patients living in the community; policy
on services

326-2 Equal treatment of patients

326-3 Care in other hospitals, homes, etc.

326-4 Officers and employees; sickness and
accident; expense

326-5 Appropriations, how spent

326-6 to 10 Repealed

326-11 Voluntary transfer to and from Kalaupapa

326-12 Repealed

326-13 Expenses; rules

326-14 to 20 Repealed

326-21 Employment of patients

326-22 Compensation of patient employees

326-23 Pensions for patient employees at
facilities

326-24 Rules

326-25 Accounts, reports

326-25.5 Annual report

326-26 Persons allowed at places for Hansen's
disease

patients

326-27 Kalaupapa store; loans for operation and
maintenance

326-28 Kalaupapa store prices; penalty

326-29 Fishing laws exemption; Kalaupapa

326-30 Making or taking of pictures without
permission

prohibited

326-31, 32 Repealed

326-33 Damien Memorial Chapel

326-34 County of Kalawao; governance

326-35 Sheriff, appointment, removal

326-36 Sheriff, salary

326-37 Sheriff, duties

326-38 Sheriff, powers

326-39 Penalty

326-40 Kalaupapa; policy on residency

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 1981, c 185, §2.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next